src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! The possessive construction results in different case ordering:
!! 
!! *N-Num-Poss-Case*:
!! 
!! * Genetive
!! * Ablative
!! * Dative
!! * Abessive
!! * Adverbial
!! * Approximative
!! * Terminative
!! 
!! *N-Num-Case-Poss*:
!! 
!! * Inessive
!! * Elative
!! * Illative
!! * Egressive
!! * Prolative
!! * Instrumental
!! 
!! Note that since the adjective 'determinative' is essentially the 3rd person
!! singular possessive, the above ordering also follows for adjective inflection.
!! Also note, some cases have atlernate forms for when tehy come before the possessive.
!! 
!! Cases with alternate forms:
!! 
!! * Accusative singular, plural
!! * Inessive singular, plural
!! * Illative singular, plural
!! * Elative singular, plural
!! 
!! *Examples*:
!! 
!! Genetive:
!! 
!! |  Px 1pSg        | Px 2pSg         | Px 3pSg
!! |  бакча-е-лэн    | бакча-ед-лэн    | бакча-ез-лэн
!! |  бакча-ос-ы-лэн | бакча-ос-ыд-лэн | бакча-ос-ыз-лэн
!! 
!! Inessive:
!! 
!! |  Px 1pSg      | Px 2pSg      | Px 3pSg
!! |  бакча-я-м    | бакча-я-д    | бакча-я-з
!! |  бакча-ос-а-м | бакча-ос-а-д | бакча-ос-а-з
!! 
!! Elative:
!! 
!! |  Px 1pSg          | Px 2pSg          | Px 3pSg
!! |  бакча-ысьты-м    | бакча-ысьты-д    | бакча-ысьты-з
!! |  бакча-ос-ысьты-м | бакча-ос-ысьты-д | бакча-ос-ысьты-з
!! 
!! * TODO: write tests for these ordering situations
!! * TODO: implement these in lexc

!! Noun Lexica
LEXICON N_EY
!! These are ordered from the Udm-Fin dictionary N_, N_Y
 N_ ;
 N_Y ;
LEXICON N_YE
!! These are ordered from the Udm-Fin dictionary N_Y, N_
 N_Y ;
 N_ ;

LEXICON N_Y
!! Words from lexicon @LEXNAME@ are characterized by the onset vowel ы instead of э
!! Kel'makov & Hännikäinen 2009: 80-81, 166: азь, вын, йыл, йыр, ки, кыл, ныл, ним, пель, пум, пыд, сьӧр, сюлэм, ул, ым
!! син:синмын, тыш:тышкын
NOUNSUF_01_Y ;

LEXICON N_
!! Words from lexicon @LEXNAME@ are mostly covered. These are from the main
!! class of nouns described in more depth above.
! NOUNSUF ; !!  2014-01-24 __If they are not against us, they are for us__
! Testing Jaska
 NOUNSUF ;

LEXICON N_rus100 ! loanword 100%
N_ ;

LEXICON N_КОРКА
!! this nouns, as well as коала, have special +N+Sg+Ine endings in "н" 
!! TODO: +N+Sg+Ine     endings	 in "н"
! Testing Jaska
 NOUNSUF ;
+Sg+Ine:%>н K;


LEXICON N_RUS_JA
!! Words from Russian in **@LEXNAME@** end in –ия, our lexicon entries
!! set the stem as ending in –ия, but there is a trigger that causes
!! the final "я" to disappear in some situations.
! Testing Jaska
:%^RusJa NOUNSUF ;
+Err/Orth: NOUNSUF ;

LEXICON N_RUS_JE
!! Words from Russian in **@LEXNAME@** end in –ие, our lexicon entries
!! set the stem as ending in –ие, but there is a trigger that causes
!! the final "е" to disappear in some situations.
! Testing Jaska
:%^RusJa NOUNSUF ;
+Err/Orth: NOUNSUF ;

LEXICON N_TAT
!! Words from Tatar in **@LEXNAME@** preserve the original stem я in all cases.
NOUNSUF ;

LEXICON N_СИН
:%^М3 NOUNSUF_01_Y_VOWEL_INIT ;
!:%^М3 NOUNSUF_01_V ;
: NOUNSUF_01_C ;

LEXICON N_НЮЛЭС
:%^К3 NOUNSUF_01_Y_VOWEL_INIT ;
!:%^К3 NOUNSUF_01_V ;
: NOUNSUF_01_C ;

LEXICON N_УРДЭС !FIXME 2024-08-13 ^Ы
:%^SYNC NOUNSUF_01_Y_VOWEL_INIT ; !урдсын
:%^К3 NOUNSUF_01_Y_VOWEL_INIT ; !урдэскын
!:%^SYNC NOUNSUF_01_V ; !урдсын
!:%^К3 NOUNSUF_01_V ; !урдэскын
: NOUNSUF_01_C ;

LEXICON N_СЮЛЭМ
:%^SYNC NOUNSUF_01_Y_VOWEL_INIT ; !сюлмын
: NOUNSUF_01_Y_VOWEL_INIT ; !сюлэмын
!:%^SYNC NOUNSUF_01_V ; !сюлмын
!: NOUNSUF_01_V ; !сюлэмын
: NOUNSUF_01_C ;


!! according to kpv temporary 2019-11-07
LEXICON CASEPOSSLEX !!≈ * **@CODE@**
! DERIVEDADJ ;    ! Deriving prenominal adjectives, республикаса
CASEPOSSLEX-afterDerivation ;

LEXICON CASEPOSSLEX-afterDerivation
AFTER-SG/PL-CASE_C ;
AFTER-SG/PL-CASE_V ;

LEXICON NMN_END-IN-Ч/ДЗ !!= * @CODE@ водз:водз
!+Cmp: R ;
+Sg: AFTER-SG/PL-CASE_C ;
+Sg: AFTER-SG/PL-CASE_V ;
+Pl:%>ьяс CASEPOSSLEX ;


!! À la Jaska
LEXICON NOUNSUF
: NOUNSUF_01 ;

LEXICON NOUNSUF_01
 NOUNSUF_01_C ;
 NOUNSUF_01_V ;

LEXICON NOUNSUF_01_Y
 NOUNSUF_01_C ;
 NOUNSUF_01_Y_VOWEL_INIT ;

LEXICON NOUNSUF_01_Y_VOWEL_INIT
+Sg: AFTER-SG-CASE_V_Y ;
+Pl:%>ъёс AFTER-SG/PL-CASE_V ;
+Sg+Ter+PxPl1:%>озямы K ; !Sg
+Sg+Ter+PxPl2:%>озяды K ; ! Sg
+Sg+Ter+PxPl3:%>озязы K ; !Sg


LEXICON NOUNSUF_01_C
+Sg: AFTER-SG/PL-CASE_C ;
+Pl:%>ъёс AFTER-SG/PL-CASE_C ;

LEXICON NOUNSUF_01_V
+Sg: AFTER-SG/PL-CASE_V ;
+Pl:%>ъёс AFTER-SG/PL-CASE_V ;
+Sg+Ter+PxPl1:%>озямы K ; !Sg
+Sg+Ter+PxPl2:%>озяды K ; ! Sg
+Sg+Ter+PxPl3:%>озязы K ; !Sg

LEXICON AFTER-SG/PL-CASE_C
 NOM_THEN_K ;
+Acc+Dial/North:%>ты K;
 GEN_THEN_K ;
 ABL_THEN_K ;
 DAT_THEN_K ;
 ABE_THEN_K ;
 APR_THEN_K ;
+Advl:%>ъя K;
! with possession
+Nom+PxPl1:%>мы K ;
+Nom+PxPl2:%>ды K ;
+Nom+PxPl3:%>зы K ;

+Acc+PxSg1:%>ме K ;
+Acc+PxSg2:%>тэ K ; ! дэ
+Acc+PxSg3:%>зэ K ;
+Acc+PxPl1:%>мес K ;
+Acc+PxPl2:%>дэс K ;
+Acc+PxPl3:%>зэс K ;

+Gen+PxPl1:%>мылэн K ;
+Gen+PxPl2:%>дылэн K ;
+Gen+PxPl3:%>зылэн K ;

+Abl+PxPl1:%>мылэсь K ;
+Abl+PxPl2:%>дылэсь K ;
+Abl+PxPl3:%>зылэсь K ;

+Dat+PxPl1:%>мылы K ;
+Dat+PxPl2:%>дылы K ;
+Dat+PxPl3:%>зылы K ;

+Abe+PxPl1:%>мытэк K ;
+Abe+PxPl2:%>дытэк K ;
+Abe+PxPl3:%>зытэк K ;

+Advl+PxPl1:%>мыя K ;
+Advl+PxPl2:%>дыя K ;
+Advl+PxPl3:%>зыя K ;

+Ter+PxPl1:%>мыозь K ;
+Ter+PxPl2:%>дыозь K ;
+Ter+PxPl3:%>зыозь K ;

+Apr+PxPl1:%>мылань K ;
+Apr+PxPl2:%>дылань K ;
+Apr+PxPl3:%>зылань K ;

!LEXICON AFTER-PL-CASE_V
!AFTER-SG/PL-CASE_V ;

LEXICON AFTER-SG/PL-CASE_V
+Acc:%>%^Е2з K;
!+Acc:%>%^Е3з K;
+Ins:%>%^Е2н K;
+Ine:%>ын K;
+Ill:%>%^Е3 K;
+Ela:%>ысь K;
+Egr:%>ысен K;
+Ter:%>озь K;
+Prl:%>этӥ K;

! with possession
+Nom+PxSg1:%>%^Е3 K ;
+Nom+PxSg2:%>%^Е3д K ;
+Nom+PxSg3:%>%^Е3з K ;

+Gen+PxSg1:%>%^Е3лэн K ;
+Gen+PxSg2:%>%^Е3длэн K ;
+Gen+PxSg3:%>%^Е3злэн K ;

+Abl+PxSg1:%>%^Е3лэсь K ;
+Abl+PxSg2:%>%^Е3длэсь K ;
+Abl+PxSg3:%>%^Е3злэсь K ;

+Dat+PxSg1:%>%^Е3лы K ;
+Dat+PxSg2:%>%^Е3длы K ;
+Dat+PxSg3:%>%^Е3злы K ;

+Ins+PxSg1:%>%^Е3ным K ;
+Ins+PxSg2:%>%^Е3ныд K ;
+Ins+PxSg3:%>%^Е3ныз K ;
+Ins+PxPl1:%>%^Е3нымы K ;
+Ins+PxPl2:%>%^Е3ныды K ;
+Ins+PxPl3:%>%^Е3нызы K ;

+Abe+PxSg1:%>%^Е3тэк K ;
+Abe+PxSg2:%>%^Е3дтэк K ;
+Abe+PxSg3:%>%^Е3зтэк K ;

+Advl+PxSg1:%>%^Е3я K ;
+Advl+PxSg2:%>%^Е3дъя K ;
+Advl+PxSg3:%>%^Е3зъя K ;

+Ine+PxSg1:%>%^А3м K ;
+Ine+PxSg2:%>%^А3д K ;
+Ine+PxSg3:%>%^А3з K ;
+Ine+PxPl1:%>%^А3мы K ;
+Ine+PxPl2:%>%^А3ды K ;
+Ine+PxPl3:%>%^А3зы K ;

+Ill+PxSg1:%>%^А3м K ;
+Ill+PxSg2:%>%^А3д K ;
+Ill+PxSg3:%>%^А3з K ;
+Ill+PxPl1:%>%^А3мы K ;
+Ill+PxPl2:%>%^А3ды K ;
+Ill+PxPl3:%>%^А3зы K ;

+Ela+PxSg1:%>ысьтым K ;  ! Kel'makov & Hännikäinen 2009 only -ысьты-
+Ela+PxSg2:%>ысьтыд K ;  ! Hence, fix yaml files!2026-05-22 yaml says no t 
+Ela+PxSg3:%>ысьтыз K ;  ! yaml says no t
+Ela+PxPl1:%>ысьтымы K ; ! yaml says no t
+Ela+PxPl2:%>ысьтыды K ; ! yaml says no t
+Ela+PxPl3:%>ысьтызы K ; ! yaml says no t

+Ela+PxSg1:%>ысеным K ;
+Ela+PxSg2:%>ысеныд K ;
+Ela+PxSg3:%>ысеныз K ;
+Ela+PxPl1:%>ысенымы K ;
+Ela+PxPl2:%>ысеныды K ;
+Ela+PxPl3:%>ысенызы K ;

+Ter+PxSg1:%>озям K ;
+Ter+PxSg2:%>озяд K ;
+Ter+PxSg3:%>озяз K ;

+Prl+PxSg1:%>этӥм K ;
+Prl+PxSg2:%>этӥд K ;
+Prl+PxSg3:%>этӥз K ;
+Prl+PxPl1:%>этӥмы K ;
+Prl+PxPl2:%>этӥды K ;
+Prl+PxPl3:%>этӥзы K ;

+Apr+PxSg1:%>элань K ;
+Apr+PxSg2:%>эдлань K ;
+Apr+PxSg3:%>эзлань K ;
